Hawaii statutes.
[§465D-3] Behavior analyst program;
established; personnel. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, there is
established a behavior analyst program within the department to be administered
by the director.

(b) The department may employ necessary
personnel without regard to chapter 76 to assist with the implementation and
continuing functions of this chapter. [L 2015, c 199, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next